Hawaii statutes.
[§352-8.5] Reentry plans;
notification. (a) The director or the director's designee shall develop a
comprehensive reentry plan for each person committed to the Hawaii youth
correctional facilities who is not serving a concurrent term of probation. The
scope of the reentry plan shall address the period of time from admission to
the Hawaii youth correctional facilities until parole or final discharge from
the department. The reentry plan shall seek to prepare committed persons for
transition to the community. The reentry plan required under this section
shall be completed within thirty days of a person's commitment to the Hawaii
youth correctional facilities and shall include:

(1) Programming, treatment, and service needs
identified in the most recently conducted risk and needs assessment;

(2) Individualized goals to guide successful reentry
to the community during parole or following final discharge; and

(3) Identification of, and a plan for, coordination
with agencies that can provide or contract for existing programs and services
relevant or necessary for successful reentry.

(b) The director or the director's designee
shall consult with a committed person's parent, legal guardian, or custodian in
developing the terms of the reentry plan and provide written copies of the plan
to the committed person and the committed person's parent, legal guardian, or
custodian. If requested, the director or the director's designee shall provide
regular updates on the committed person's progress concerning the reentry plan
to the committed person's parent, legal guardian, or custodian.

(c) The director or the director's designee
may collaborate with, and provide information to, the probation officer of a
person committed to the Hawaii youth correctional facilities who is serving a
concurrent term of probation, upon the probation officer's request, for the
probation officer to incorporate the reentry plan into the person's case plan
required under section 571-48.5 at the probation officer's discretion.

(d) The director or the director's designee
shall notify the parent, legal guardian, or custodian, and any relevant agency
or service provider that may be involved in the person's transition to the
community, at least thirty days prior to discharging a committed person, of the
intended discharge of the person.

(e) The director or the director's designee
shall review, and update if necessary, reentry plans for each person taken into
custody pursuant to section 352-26. [L 2014, c 201, §2]

Note

Section applies to delinquent behavior committed on or after
July 1, 2014. L 2014, c 201, §21.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next